District of Columbia statutes.
42-1309

Method of delivery.

Delivery of a disclosure statement required by this chapter shall be by personal delivery, facsimile delivery, or by registered mail to the prospective transferee. Execution by the transferor of a facsimile counterpart of the disclosure statement shall be considered to be execution of the original.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 10, 46 DCR 2111
1981 Ed., § 45-959.